Arkansas, session 2025, HB1761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2506(a)(3)(A)(i)(e)-(g), concerning
student eligibility for the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program, is amended to read as follows:
(e) A child of active-duty uniformed service
personnel, as identified under Title 10, Title 32, Title 33, or Title 42 of
the United States Code; or
(f) A student who was enrolled in the previous
school year in a:
(1) Public school that has a rating of
“F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and State Board of Education rules; or
(2) Public school district classified as
in need of Level 5 — Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(g) A student who is enrolling in kindergarten
*TNL271*
03/12/2025 7:43:51 AM TNL271

HB1761
for the first time.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-2506(a)(3)(C) is amended to read as
follows:
(C)(i) For the 2025-2026 school year and each year
thereafter, any resident of this state who is eligible to enroll in a public
elementary or secondary school shall be eligible student eligibility shall
include students who meet at least one (1) of the following:
(i) A student who is eligible under subdivision
(a)(3)(B)(i) of this section;
(ii) A student who is continuing to participate in
the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program from the 2024-
2025 school year; or
(iii) A resident of this state who is eligible to
enroll in a public elementary or secondary school if:
(a) His or her family has a gross family
income not exceeding two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty
level;
(b)(1) His or her family has a gross family
income exceeding two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty
level but not exceeding three hundred fifty percent (350%) of the federal
poverty level.
(2) However, a student eligible for an
account under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(iii)(b)(1) of this section shall receive
only fifty percent (50%) of the prior year's statewide foundation funding
allocated per student under § 6-20-2305; or
(c)(1) His or her family has a gross family
income exceeding three hundred fifty percent (350%) of the federal poverty
level but not exceeding four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty
level.
(2) However, a student eligible for an
account under subdivision (a)(3)(C)(iii)(c)(1) of this section shall receive
only twenty-five percent (25%) of the prior year's statewide foundation
funding allocated per student under § 6-20-2305.
(ii) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, there
shall be no limitation on student participation in the Arkansas Children's
03/12/2025 7:43:51 AM TNL271

HB1761
Educational Freedom Account Program.



































03/12/2025 7:43:51 AM TNL271